Hawaii, session 2026, HB1383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that more programs and services must be established to address the unmet needs of children and families at risk of child welfare system involvement. The malama ohana working group was established by Act 86, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, within the office of wellness and resilience to seek, design, and recommend transformative changes to the State's existing child welfare system.  In its report submitted to the legislature, the malama ohana working group stated that there is a shortage of resources in Hawaii dedicated to preventing the need for children's and families' involvement with child welfare services, especially primary prevention and universal support.  Many families at high risk of entering the child welfare system are unaware of available services or how to access them.  The malama ohana working group recommended that the establishment of programs, such as universal family supports, that allow families to thrive be prioritized above all other commitments in an effort to divert children and families away from involvement with the child welfare system.  The malama ohana working group specifically provided suggestions for family support, such as creating accessible pathways to concrete supports like food and shelter, establishing community-based resource centers staffed by individuals with lived experience, and meeting families' basic needs for housing, child care, and physical and mental health care. The legislature further finds that examples of child welfare diversion programs exist in other states and have been successful in reducing the number of families involved with child welfare.  These diversion programs have been successful by screening at-risk families and providing them with peer support and system navigation, resource program supports and financial assistance, and parenting and family-strengthening classes and therapy. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for a five-year family resilience pilot program within the office of wellness and resilience. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established within the office of wellness and resilience a family resilience pilot program, in which the office of wellness and resilience shall provide: (1)  Trauma-informed peer support navigators who have lived experience going through the social service system to assist families with enrollment in public or other benefits, family strengthening, and cultural programming; (2)  Financial assistance and resource supports to aid with food, clothing, hygiene, housing, parenting, child care, household, and transportation needs; and (3)  A trauma-informed, parenting intervention program that improves caregiver-child relationships and parenting skills through teaching and coaching on positive communication, child behavior management strategies, and calming and emotional regulation strategies for both caregiver and child. (b) The office of wellness and resilience shall establish, no later than December 31, 2025, the following: (1)  Data and referral system tracking needs and protocols to comply with applicable federal and state laws; and (2)  An implementation and evaluation plan that includes specific, measurable, attainable, reasonable, and time-bound goals. (c)  The office of wellness and resilience shall submit a report of the effectiveness and participation in the pilot program, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2031. (d)  The family resilience pilot program shall cease on June 30, 2030. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the office of wellness and resilience to establish a family resilience pilot program pursuant to this Act, including the contracting of services to implement the pilot program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of wellness and resilience for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.